Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Shelters for Runaway Minors.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent in connection with the enactment of this article, see § 1(a), ch. 33, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

Sec. 47.10.392.
Certificate required.

A private residence may not be held out publicly as a shelter for runaway minors unless the residence

is designated a shelter for runaways by a corporation that is licensed to make the designation under AS 47.32; and

has a valid permit from the department signifying that designation.

History.

(§ 19 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 21 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

For administration, see 7 AAC 56, art. 2.

For services related to the decision to place a child, see 7 AAC 56, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraph (1).

Sec. 47.10.394.
Operation of shelters.

A shelter for runaways may not shelter a runaway minor for more than seven days unless the department determines that

the minor is the subject of exceptional circumstances; or

another appropriate setting is not available for the minor.

The provider of a shelter for runaways shall promptly, but within one state working day, inform the department of a runaway minor in the shelter

who claims to be the victim of child abuse or neglect;

whom the provider has reasonable cause to suspect has been a victim of child abuse or neglect; or

whom the provider has reason to believe is evading the supervision of the department, the person to whom the department has entrusted supervision, or the minor’s legal guardian.

In this section, “child abuse or neglect” has the meaning given in AS

47.17.290

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 120 SLA 1996; am §§ 57, 58 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, as defined in AS

47.17.290

” at the end of (b)(1); added (c).

Sec. 47.10.396.
Confidentiality of records.

If the department requires record keeping by a shelter for runaways or by a corporation that is licensed to designate shelters for runaways, records of the shelter and the corporation that identify a runaway minor who has been sheltered in a shelter for runaways or has sought assistance from a shelter for runaways are confidential and are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

unless

after being informed of the minor’s right to privacy, the minor consents in writing to the disclosure of the records;

the records are relevant to an investigation or proceeding involving child abuse or neglect or a child in need of aid petition; or

disclosure of the records is necessary to protect the life or health of the minor.

History.

(§ 19 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 71 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in the introductory language twice deleted “nonprofit” preceding “corporation”.

Sec. 47.10.398.
Immunity from liability.

A person in a shelter for runaways, or in a home for which an application to be designated a shelter for runaways is being considered by a corporation licensed for that purpose by the department, that is operated in a manner that is consistent with AS

47.10.392

—

47.10.399

and regulations adopted under those sections is not criminally liable under AS

11.51.130(a)(4)

.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the provider of a shelter for runaways, or of a home for which an application to be designated a shelter for runaways is being considered by a corporation approved for that purpose by the department, that is operated in a manner that is consistent with AS

47.10.392

—

47.10.399

and regulations adopted under those sections and the members of the provider’s household, other than a runaway minor, are not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission

in admitting or refusing to admit a runaway minor to the shelter or home; or

by a runaway minor who is sheltered in the shelter or home.

The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of recklessness or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 19 ch 33 SLA 1994; am §§ 11, 12 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Sec. 47.10.399.
Definitions.

In AS

47.10.392

—

47.10.399

,

“runaway minor” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.390

;

“shelter for runaways” or “shelter for runaway minors” means a private residence whose legal occupant agrees to shelter, with or without compensation, a runaway minor accepted into the residence by the legal occupant and that

is not simultaneously licensed under AS

47.10.310

as a program for runaway minors;

has been designated a shelter for runaways by a corporation licensed for that purpose under AS 47.32; and

has a permit issued by the department under AS 47.32.

History.

(§ 19 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 22 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in subparagraphs (2)(B) and (2)(C).

Secs. 47.10.400 — 47.10.490.
Citizens’ review panel for permanency planning. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.14.200 — 47.14.299.]